North Carolina, session 2025, HB1060.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 1 of Chapter 114 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 114-8.8. Investigations into incidents involving federal law enforcement.
(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) CBP. – Customs and Border Protection of the United States Department of
Homeland Security.
(2) Federal immigration enforcement. – Officers, agents, or other personnel
employed by CBP or ICE, or any State or local law enforcement officers or
employees authorized to perform immigration officer functions pursuant to
section 287(g) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. § 1357.
(3) ICE. – Immigration and Customs Enforcement of the United States
Department of Homeland Security.
(b) Investigations. – The Attorney General shall investigate all incidents occurring in this
State that involve federal immigration enforcement and result in serious bodily injury or death to
any party. The investigation shall determine the cause and circumstances of the incident.
(c) Reports. – The Attorney General shall publicly release all findings and
recommendations from any investigation described in subsection (b) of this section and deliver
copies of such findings to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate within seven days of completing an investigation. The Attorney General
may redact the names and personally identifying information of any victims and minors
mentioned in such findings."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice the sum of four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to implement the requirements of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to incidents
occurring on or after that date.
*H1060-v-1*